Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-602
Formation; certificate; contents; filing; effect; certified copy as evidence; amendments to bylaws; certification; filing.

Upon organization, and before commencing business, the trustees shall cause to be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the association shall have its principal place of business, a certificate showing the names of the incorporators and officers authorized to conduct its business, with their addresses, the name of the association, its principal place of business, and a copy of its bylaws. A copy of the certificate shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. Upon the filing of this certificate, the trustees and their associated members and successors, shall be invested with full corporate powers, and a certified copy of said certificate shall be deemed and taken in all courts as prima facie proof of the existence of such association. Amendments of the bylaws must likewise be filed and recorded in the office of the county clerk, when properly certified as having been legally adopted, before becoming operative.

Laws 1913, c. 168, § 2, p. 512;

R.S.1913, § 710;

C.S.1922, § 619;

C.S.1929, § 13-602;

R.S.1943, § 12-602.

Filing of certificate is required. Omaha Nat. Bank v. West Lawn Mausoleum Assn., 158 Neb. 412, 63 N.W.2d 504 (1954).